Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Article 1. Department of Health
§ 9-2-111.
Division of vocational rehabilitation; provision of authorized services; related powers.

Except as otherwise provided by law, the division shall provide the services authorized by this act to eligible individuals with disabilities. The division may:

Cooperate with other departments, agencies and institutions, both public and private, in providing the services authorized by this act to individuals with disabilities;

Enter into reciprocal agreements with other states to provide for the services authorized by this act to residents of the contracting states;

Establish and operate rehabilitation facilities and workshops and make grants to public and nonprofit organizations for those purposes;

Supervise the operation of small businesses established pursuant to this act to be conducted by eligible individuals with disabilities;

Provide training and instruction, including establishing and maintaining research fellowships and traineeships with stipends and allowances, in matters relating to vocational rehabilitation;

Establish new vending machine sites on any state owned public property, except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, in cooperation with the administrator or governing body in charge of the public property;

Bid out all vending machine sites located on any state owned public property, except as provided in subsection (b) of this section. Vending machines currently located on public property and under a written contract with a specific renewal or termination date will not be affected by this section until the renewal or termination date;

Enter into contracts with vendors for the installation and operation of vending machine sites on any state owned public property, except as provided in subsection (b) of this section. These contracts shall include a provision for the payment of commissions to the division based on gross revenues from the vending machines. These commissions shall be placed in an account which shall be used for the establishment and administration of small businesses created under this act. The division may assign a portion of the commissions to operators of small businesses created under this act for the maintenance of their income;

Promulgate rules and regulations to provide:

Definitions to include the terms “contract bid preference,” “small businesses,” “public property” and “vending machine sites”;

Methods for determining the contract bid preference eligibility under W.S.

9-2-115

;

Methods of recovering the cost of establishing small businesses and maintaining equipment;

Methods for determining the portion of commissions to be assigned to small business operators for the maintenance of their income.

Encourage the establishment of vending machine sites and small businesses on privately owned or controlled property.

The provisions of this act shall not apply to state owned public property included in W.S.

36-8-1001

through

36-8-1002

or state owned public property used to conduct the state fair or the Wyoming pioneer memorial museum under W.S.

11-10-101

through

11-10-114

[11-10-101 through

11-10-115

] or the University of Wyoming or Wyoming community colleges.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 225, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 21-305; Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 204; 1975, ch. 115, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

9-3-203

; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1993, ch. 222, § 1; 2005, ch. 231, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, deleted reference to the trust and agency fund in (a)(viii).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 9-2-109(a)(iv).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

§ 9-2-112.
Division of vocational rehabilitation; cooperation with federal government in providing services to individuals with disabilities.

The division shall cooperate with the federal government in implementing federal statutes pertaining to the purposes of this act, including the licensing of blind persons or other individuals with disabilities to operate small businesses on federal property. The division may adopt methods of administration necessary for the proper and efficient operation of agreements with the federal government and to secure the full benefits of the federal statutes.

Upon designation by the governor, the division may perform functions and services for the federal government relating to individuals with a physical or mental disability other than those described in subsection (a) of this section.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 225, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 21-306; Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 205; 1975, ch. 115, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

9-3-204

; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1993, ch. 222, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 9-2-109(a)(iv).

§ 9-2-113.
Division of vocational rehabilitation; federal and state funds; custody and disbursement by state treasurer; gifts.

The state treasurer is the custodian of all funds received from the federal government for vocational rehabilitation or to implement any agreements authorized by this act. The division of vocational rehabilitation shall disburse federal and state funds available for those purposes and submit receipt and acknowledgement to the state treasurer.

The division may accept and use gifts for carrying out the purposes of this act. The gifts may be held, invested, reinvested and used in accordance with the conditions of the gift.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 225, §§ 5, 6; W.S. 1957, §§ 21-308, 21-309; Laws 1969, ch. 111, §§ 206, 207; 1975, ch. 115, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§

9-3-205

,

9-3-206

; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 2015 ch. 12, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in (b), substituted “division of vocational rehabilitation” for “state treasurer” and “and submit receipt and acknowledgement to the state treasurer” for “upon certification by the division” in the second sentence.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 9-2-109(a)(iv).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

What constitutes federal financial assistance for purposes of § 504 of Rehabilitation Act (29 U.S.C.A. § 794), which prohibits any program or activity receiving federal financial assistance from discriminating on basis of disability, 147 ALR Fed 205.

§ 9-2-114.
Division of vocational rehabilitation; services; persons eligible; extent provided at public cost; regulation as to selection of persons to be benefited; right to benefit not transferable.

Vocational rehabilitation services shall be provided to eligible residents with disabilities and to other individuals with disabilities who are eligible under an agreement with another state or the federal government.

Goods or services shall be provided at public cost only to the extent that the individual with disabilities requires financial assistance with respect thereto. However, the following services may be provided at public cost:

Diagnostic and related services, including transportation, required for the determination of eligibility for service and of the nature and scope of the services to be provided;

Guidance; and

Job related services, including job search and placement, job retention services and follow-up services.

If vocational rehabilitation services cannot be provided to all eligible individuals with disabilities, the division shall adopt, by regulation, a method for selecting those to whom services will be provided.

The right of any individual to any benefit under this act [§§

9-2-109

through

9-2-115

] is not transferable or assignable at law or in equity.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 225, §§ 7, 8; W.S. 1957, §§ 21-310, 21-311; Laws 1969, ch. 111, §§ 208, 209; 1975, ch. 115, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§

9-3-207

,

9-3-208

; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1993, ch. 222, § 1; 1999, ch. 46, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 9-2-109(a)(iv).

§ 9-2-115.
Division of vocational rehabilitation; preference given to eligible individuals with disabilities in operating small businesses on public property; new construction and remodeling; effect of preference on existing small businesses.

Individuals with disabilities determined to be eligible by the division shall be given a contract bid preference on small contracts, where the small business was established pursuant to this act. The contract bid preference shall apply to small businesses on either public or private property which were established pursuant to this act.

The administrator or governing body in charge of any public property, in cooperation with the division may construct a new facility or remodel a preexisting facility to accommodate a small business established pursuant to this act.

The contract bid preference granted by this section does not affect the rights of persons currently operating a small business on public property and under a written contract with a specific renewal or termination date, until the renewal or termination date. After the renewal or termination date, the division shall bid out the small business contract and apply contract bid preferences where applicable.

History.

Laws 1965; ch. 36, §§ 1 to 3; W.S. 1957, §§ 9-160.18:29 to 9-160.18:31; Laws 1969, ch. 111, §§ 210 to 212; 1975, ch. 115, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§

9-3-209

to

9-3-211

; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1993, ch. 222, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 9-2-109(a)(iv).

§ 9-2-116.
Legislative findings; purposes.

The legislature finds that a shortage of primary care physicians and allied health providers exists in the state of Wyoming which limits the availability of adequate health care services for the citizens of the state who live in rural areas. The legislature further finds that the number of qualified physicians and allied health care providers can be increased to enhance the provision of rural health care services by the adoption of incentives to attract more primary care physicians and allied health care providers to communities experiencing these shortages. The legislature therefore enacts the Rural Health Care Act of 1993 to create an office of rural health care and to create a loan repayment program to repay education loans of primary care physicians and allied health care providers who practice for specified periods of time in designated communities which are experiencing shortages.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 228, § 1.

Rural Health Care Act of 1993. —

The Rural Health Care Act of 1993 is codified as §§

9-2-116

through

9-2-119

.

§ 9-2-117.
Office of rural health created; duties.

The office of rural health is created within the department of health. The office shall:

Serve as a clearinghouse for information on primary health care services in communities and rural areas of Wyoming and provide for dissemination of information by appropriate means to interested citizens of the state;

Provide technical assistance and consultation services to communities and rural areas, including hospitals located in these communities and rural areas, and thereby assist citizens’ groups, local officials and health professionals to:

Recruit and retain health care professionals and support personnel as required;

Assess health care needs and priorities in rural areas;

Identify sources of funding and programming, including information on rural health care districts;

Establish strong working relationships with health care professionals throughout the state;

Repealed by Laws 2016, ch. 37, § 2.

Assist in the development of rural health clinics;

Repealed by Laws 2016, ch. 37, § 2.

Contract, if necessary, with other entities to carry out duties prescribed under this section, and to conduct an active and ongoing recruitment program for physicians and other health care professionals, subject to the availability of funds, and to engage in the following activities:

Assist communities in their effort to recruit and retain physicians and other health care professionals;

Assist communities in the contact and evaluation of potential candidates;

Conduct community studies to ascertain viable support for health care professionals;

Assist physicians and other health care professionals and their families to find communities that will meet their needs and expectations;

Maintain close liaison with government and private sources of health care providers;

Assess the availability of health care providers in the state;

Facilitate incorporation of mid-level providers into the state health delivery system.

Collaborate with state agencies, private health organizations and professional and community organizations in a continuing effort to improve needed rural, primary care and other health care services for the people of Wyoming;

Administer the loan repayment programs created by W.S.

9-2-118

and

9-2-119

;

In collaboration with the state health officer and the state chief information officer, represent the department of health in a consortium of state agencies, private health organizations and professional and community organizations to facilitate the operations of a statewide interoperable telemedicine/telehealth network using existing internet protocol based communication and videoconferencing infrastructure and telecommunication services to the extent possible. The consortium shall:

Consist of members appointed by the director of the department of health, to include the Wyoming chief information officer or the officer’s designee;

Coordinate the development and promotion of statewide standards for an interoperable telemedicine/telehealth network and, where applicable, promote definitions and standards for statewide electronic health transactions;

Promote and conduct education programs that inform network users that information communicated through the use of telemedicine/telehealth shall conform with state and federal privacy and security laws and information security programs established by the state chief information officer;

Have the authority to seek funds for consortium operation and contract as needed to carry out its responsibilities.

In collaboration with the state health officer and the state chief information officer or their designees, coordinate with appropriate state agencies to establish incentives to implement, promote and facilitate the voluntary exchange of secure telemedicine/telehealth network information between and among individuals, entities and agencies that are providing and paying for services authorized under the Medicaid program, in conformity with rules adopted by the state chief information officer;

In collaboration with the state health officer and the state chief information officer or their designees, develop and promote a common direction for a statewide interoperable telemedicine/telehealth network among state agencies, in conformity with rules adopted by the department of enterprise technology services;

As required by W.S. 33-1-303(a)(iv) and in collaboration with the state health officer and the state chief information officer or their designees, collaborate with professional and occupational licensure boards concerning the promulgation of rules and definitions related to the practice of telemedicine/telehealth and the use of telemedicine/telehealth technologies.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 228, § 1; 1995, ch. 39, § 1; 2009, ch. 140, § 1; 2012, ch. 30, § 3; 2016 ch. 37, §§
1, 2, effective July 1, 2016; 2017 ch. 90, § 1, effective March 1, 2017; 2021 ch. 41, § 1, effective March 30, 2021.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, rewrote (a)(vi), which read: “In cooperation with the state telecommunications council established under W.S.

9-2-1026

.2, coordinate and plan the development of a statewide telemedicine capability using existing telecommunications infrastructure and services to the extent possible. In accordance with W.S.

9-2-1026

.2, the office and the council shall report plans and recommendations to the governor and the legislature”; and added (a)(vi)(A) through (a)(vi)(D) and added (a)(vii) and (a)(viii).

The 2012 amendment,

substituted “department of enterprise technology services” for “state chief information officer” in (a)(viii).

Laws 2012, ch. 30, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 8, 2012.

The 2016 amendments. —

The first
2016 amendment, by ch. 37 § 1, effective July 1, 2016, deleted “care” following “rural health” in (a); deleted “of families living” following “priorities” in (a)(ii)(B); deleted “and the best beginnings program in Albany county” at the end of (a)(ii)(C); rewrote former (a)(iii)(F) which read: “Assess the availability of nurse practitioners and physician assistants in the state and in coordination with other appropriate organizations, determine additional training needs for these health care professionals”; and, in (a)(iv), substituted “Collaborate with” for “Develop a consortium of” and inserted “and” following “health organizations.”

The second 2016 amendment, by ch. 37 § 2, effective July 1, 2016, repealed former (a)(ii)(E), which read: “Encourage the development of risk management programs”; and (a)(ii)(G), which read: “Design and implement programs enhancing state primary care services and state health promotion and disease prevention efforts.”

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2017 amendment

, in (a), added (a)(ix).

Laws 2017, ch. 90, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 1, 2017.

The 2021 amendment

, added "subject to the availability of funds" in (a)(iii).

Laws 2021, ch. 41, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 30, 2021.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1995, ch. 39, § 2, which repealed this section effective July 1, 1998, was itself repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 12, § 1, effective April 1, 1998.

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Study. —

Laws 2004, Sp. Sess., ch. 4, § 5, directs the office of rural health care to study the number of physicians, nurses, nurse practitioners and physician assistants who are providing patient care within the state and to determine for each of those: (1) the provider's specialty; (2) the location at which the provider provides care; (3) the length of time the provider has been providing care in this state; (4) whether the provider is practicing full or part time; (5) whether the provider is practicing independently or in association with a hospital or other health care facility; (6) whether the provider has any military obligation; (7) whether the provider has hospital privileges at any Wyoming hospital; (8) whether the provider's medical education was funded by the state of Wyoming through WWAMI, WICHE, contract or similar medical education program; and (9) whether the number of physicians reported and their areas of specialties indicate a physician shortage in those or other areas of specialty. The office is to report its findings to the joint appropriations, joint corporations, elections and political subdivisions, joint judiciary and joint labor, health and social services interim committees on or before November 1, 2004.

Laws 2004, Sp. Sess., ch. 4, § 9(c) appropriates $70,000 or so much thereof as is necessary from the general fund to the department of health for the purposes of the act.

Laws 2004, Sp. Sess., ch. 4, § 10, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved July 29, 2004.

§ 9-2-118.
Physician and dentist loan repayment program.

The department is authorized to enter into agreements with physicians and dentists who have graduated from accredited residency programs to provide health care in this state. The agreements shall:

Provide for the physician or dentist to practice medicine in a community of the state from among a list of communities developed by the department. A physician or dentist shall agree to provide medical care for the period of the contract in underserved areas of the state and shall accept patients qualified under the Medical Assistance and Services Act, Title XVIII of the federal Social Security Act and the child health insurance program who seek medical care which the physician or dentist is qualified to provide;

Provide that the physician or dentist shall be repaid up to one hundred percent (100%) of the amount of outstanding educational loans the physician or dentist has acquired as a direct result of undergraduate or postgraduate educational training directly related to providing medical or dental services, not to exceed thirty thousand dollars ($30,000.00) per year, in exchange for practicing his profession under the terms of this section;

Require the physician or dentist to practice for a minimum of three (3) years under the agreement;

Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 148, § 2.

Contain other provisions the department deems necessary or appropriate to accomplish the purposes of this section.

The department, in consultation with the appropriate licensing board and professional association, shall promulgate rules necessary to carry out the purposes of this section. In carrying out this section the department shall assess health care needs of the state by geographic areas and practice specialties and shall prioritize and enter into agreements under this section accordingly.

The department may vary the terms of each agreement in accordance with this section based upon the community and the number of the physician’s or dentist’s patients whose cost of care is reimbursed under Title XVIII of the federal Social Security Act, the child health insurance program or the Wyoming Medical Assistance and Services Act.

Repealed by Laws 2008, ch. 121, § 3.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 228, § 1; 2004, ch. 106, § 1; 2005, ch. 148, §§ 1, 2; 2006, ch. 118, § 1; 2007, ch. 203, § 1; 2008, ch. 121, §§ 2, 3.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, rewrote (a), adding dentists as eligible providers, and in (a)(i), adding the second and third sentences; and in (d) substituted “twenty-five percent (25%) of the money is matched” for “the money is equally matched,” and substituted “health care facility or health care association” for “or hospital.”

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (a)(i), inserted “Title XVIII of the federal Social Security Act” and deleted the former final sentence, which read: “The department of health, in consultation with the state board of medicine and the board of dental examiners, shall determine which areas of the state are underserved and which provider services are most needed in each underserved area”; repealed former (a)(iv), which prohibited a physician or dentist from discriminating against any patient whose cost of care is reimbursed under Title XVIII of the federal Social Security Act or the Wyoming Medical Assistance and Services Act; and in (c), inserted “the physician's or dentist's” and “child health insurance program,” and deleted “served by the physician” from the end; and made stylistic changes.

The 2006 amendment,

effective July 1, 2006, deleted “after completing undergraduate programs and” following “acquired” in (a)(ii); substituted “appropriate licensing board and professional association” for “departmental advisory council” in (b).

The 2007 amendments. —

in (a)(ii) substituted “undergraduate or postgraduate educational” for “medical or dental school” and inserted “directly related to providing medical or dental services.”

Laws 2007, ch. 203, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 8, 2007.

The 2008 amendment

deleted “including the matching funds specified in subsection (d) of this section” following “per year” in (a)(ii); and repealed (d) which read: “No state money shall be expended for repayment of any loan under this section unless twenty-five percent (25%) of the money is matched with other funds in any combination from any county, city, school district, health care facility or health care association.”

Laws 2008, ch. 121, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2008.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1995, ch. 39, § 3(a), provides: “No agreements shall be entered into by the department of health under W.S.

9-2-118

and

9-2-119

on or after July 1, 1998.”

Laws 1995, ch. 39, § 3(b) provides: “The department of health shall administer agreements entered into under W.S.

9-2-118

and

9-2-119

prior to July 1, 1998, until satisfaction of all obligations and requirements thereunder.”

Social Security Act. —

The federal Social Security Act, referred to in this section, is codified throughout title 42 of the United States Code.

Wyoming Medical Assistance and Services Act. —

See §

42-4-101

et seq.

Appropriations. —

Laws 2004, ch. 106, § 2, appropriates $720,000 from the budget reserve account to the department of health to fund all three years of the loan repayment agreements specified in W.S.

9-2-118

and $240,000 to fund all three years of the loan repayment agreements specified in W.S.

9-2-119

. Notwithstanding W.S. 9-4-207(a), this appropriation is not to revert to the general fund at the end of any fiscal year. Section 2 additionally appropriates $30,000 from the budget reserve account to the department of health to administer the loan repayment program. The department is to report to the joint interim labor, health and social services interim committee by October 1, 2004, and October 1, 2005, on the administration of the loan repayment programs.

Laws 2006, ch. 118, § 3, appropriates funds as follows:

“(a)

Three million dollars ($3,000,000.00)is appropriated from the budget reserve account to the departmentof health for loan repayments pursuant to W.S.

9-2-118

.

“(b)

Two million dollars ($2,000,000.00) isappropriated from the budget reserve account to the department ofhealth for loan repayments pursuant to W.S.

9-2-119

.

“(c)

Ninety-three thousand dollars ($93,000.00)is appropriated from the general fund to the department of healthand one (1) additional part-time position is authorized for the purposeof administering the physician and health care provider loan repaymentprograms pursuant to W.S.

9-2-118

and

9-2-119

.”

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Determination and application of correct legal standard in weighing medical opinion of treating source in Social Security disability cases, 149 ALR Fed 1.

§ 9-2-119.
Allied health care provider loan repayment program.

The department is authorized to enter into agreements with health care providers licensed or certified to provide health care services in this state including, but not limited to, hospital, medical, surgical, dental, vision, nursing, radiology, mental health, speech language pathology and pharmaceutical services. The agreements shall:

Require the health care provider to provide health care services in a community of the state from among a list of communities developed by the department. A health care provider shall agree to provide medical care for the period of the contract in underserved areas of the state and shall accept patients qualified under the Medical Assistance and Services Act, Title XVIII of the federal Social Security Act and the child health insurance program who seek medical care which the health care provider is qualified to provide;

Provide that the health care provider shall be repaid up to one hundred percent (100%) of the amount of outstanding educational loans the provider has acquired as a direct result of undergraduate or postgraduate educational training directly related to providing medical services, not to exceed twenty thousand dollars ($20,000.00) per year, in exchange for practicing under the terms of this section;

Require the health care provider to agree to provide health care services for a minimum of three (3) years under the agreement;

Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 148, § 2.

Contain other provisions the department deems necessary or appropriate to accomplish the purposes of this section.

The department, in consultation with the appropriate licensing board and professional association, shall promulgate rules necessary to carry out the purposes of this section. In carrying out this section the department shall assess health care needs of the state by geographic areas and particular health care services required and shall prioritize and enter into agreements under this section accordingly.

The department may vary the terms of each agreement in accordance with this section based upon the community and the number of the health care provider’s patients whose cost of care is reimbursed under Title XVIII of the federal Social Security Act, the child health insurance program or the Wyoming Medical Assistance and Services Act.

Repealed by Laws 2006, ch. 118, § 2.

In selecting health care providers for agreements pursuant to this section, the department shall give priority when practical to qualified graduates of the University of Wyoming or a Wyoming community college.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 228, § 1; 2004, ch. 106, § 1; Laws 2005, ch. 148, §§ 1, 2; 2006, ch. 118, §§ 1, 2; 2007, ch. 203, § 1; 2015 ch. 89, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, in (a) substituted “certified” for “legally authorized,” and inserted “radiology, mental health” following “medical, surgical, dental, vision, nursing,” and in (a)(ii) inserted “including the matching funds specified in subsection (d) of this section” following “ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00) per year”; and in (d) substituted “twenty-five percent (25%) of the money is matched” for “the money is equally matched,” and substituted “health care facility or health care association” for “or hospital.”

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (a)(i), inserted “Title XVIII of the federal Social Security Act” and deleted the former final sentence, which read: “The department of health, in consultation with the appropriate health care provider licensing boards, shall determine which areas of the state are underserved and which provider services are most needed in each underserved area”; repealed former (a)(iv), which prohibited a health care provider from discriminating against any patient whose cost of care is reimbursed under Title XVIII of the federal Social Security Act or the Wyoming Medical Assistance and Services Act; in (c), inserted “the health care provider's” and “child health insurance program,” and deleted “served by the health care provider” from the end; and made stylistic changes.

The 2006 amendment,

effective July 1, 2006, inserted “speech language pathology” in the introductory language of (a); deleted “including the matching funds specified in subsection (d) of this section” following “per year”; in (a)(ii); substituted “appropriate licensing board and profession association” for “departmental advisory council” in (b); repealed former (d), which pertained to state money being expended for repayment of loans under this section; and added (e)(i).

The 2007 amendments. —

in (a)(ii) inserted “direct” following “provider has acquired as a” and inserted “undergraduate or postgraduate” preceding “educational training directly related.”

Laws 2007, ch. 203, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 8, 2007.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in (a)(ii), substituted “twenty thousand dollars ($20,000.00)” for “ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00).”

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1995, ch. 39, § 3(a), provides: “No agreements shall be entered into by the department of health under W.S.

9-2-118

and

9-2-119

on or after July 1, 1998.”

Laws 1995, ch. 39, § 3(b), provides: “The department of health shall administer agreements entered into under W.S.

9-2-118

and

9-2-119

prior to July 1, 1998, until satisfaction of all obligations and requirements thereunder.”

Social Security Act. —

The federal Social Security Act, referred to in this section, is codified throughout.

Wyoming Medical Assistance and Services Act. —

See §

42-4-101

et seq.

Appropriations. —

Laws 2004, ch. 106, § 2, appropriates $720,000 from the budget reserve account to the department of health to fund all three years of the loan repayment agreements specified in W.S.

9-2-118

and $240,000 to fund all three years of the loan repayment agreements specified in W.S.

9-2-119

. Notwithstanding W.S. 9-4-207(a), this appropriation is not to revert to the general fund at the end of any fiscal year. Section 2 additionally appropriates $30,000 from the budget reserve account to the department of health to administer the loan repayment program. The department is to report to the joint interim labor, health and social services interim committee by October 1, 2004, and October 1, 2005, on the administration of the loan repayment programs.

Laws 2006, ch. 118, § 3, appropriates funds as follows:

“(a)

Three million dollars ($3,000,000.00)is appropriated from the budget reserve account to the departmentof health for loan repayments pursuant to W.S.

9-2-118

.

“(b)

Two million dollars ($2,000,000.00) isappropriated from the budget reserve account to the department ofhealth for loan repayments pursuant to W.S.

9-2-119

.

“(c)

Ninety-three thousand dollars ($93,000.00)is appropriated from the general fund to the department of healthand one (1) additional part-time position is authorized for the purposeof administering the physician and health care provider loan repaymentprograms pursuant to W.S.

9-2-118

and

9-2-119

.”

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Determination and application of correct legal standard in weighing medical opinion of treating source in Social Security disability cases, 149 ALR Fed 1.

§ 9-2-120.
[Renumbered.]

Renumbered as §

9-4-1203

by Laws 2000, ch. 52, § 2.

§ 9-2-121.
[Renumbered.]

Renumbered as §

9-4-1204

by Laws 2000, ch. 52, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2000, ch. 78, § 1, enacted §

9-2-121

. That section was renumbered as §

9-4-1204

by the Wyoming Legislative Service Office pursuant to W.S.

8-1-105

.

§ 9-2-122.
Substance abuse control plan.

The department of health shall develop a detailed, comprehensive substance abuse control plan for prevention, early intervention and treatment designed to curb alcohol and controlled substance abuse in the state of Wyoming.

The department of health or contractor shall work, to the greatest extent feasible, in collaboration with the University of Wyoming statistical analysis center in determining appropriate data regarding early warning signs of substance abuse.

The plan shall also recommend how the services of schools, community mental health centers, social service providers, local health care providers, law enforcement, corrections and any other entities presently available in the state of Wyoming can better serve the state in responding to substance abuse problems. The substance abuse control plan should decrease the potential overlapping of these services while maintaining a collaborative effort among state and local governmental entities and other organizations to assure maximum leveraging of resources, including people and money. The plan should identify and address the filling of gaps in the continuum of needed services. The substance abuse control plan shall also include recommendations to the executive, legislative and judicial branches of the state of Wyoming regarding programs and funding determinations which those entities may make.

Repealed by Laws 2008, ch. 44, § 2.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 151, § 1; 2008, ch. 44, § 2.

The 2008 amendment,

repealed former (d), pertaining to various reporting requirements to the legislature and legislative committees.

Laws 2008, ch. 44, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 5, 2008.